RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.aff
SFX T šti     šiančiojoje     šti       
SFX T šti     šiančiojoj      šti       
SFX T šti     šiančiosioms    šti       
SFX T šti     šiančiąsias     šti       
SFX T šti     šiančiosiomis   šti       
SFX T šti     šiančiosiose    šti       
SFX T ti      tas             ti        
SFX T ti      to              ti        
SFX T ti      tam             ti        
SFX T ti      tą              ti        
SFX T ti      tu              ti        
SFX T ti      tame            ti        
SFX T ti      ti              ti        
SFX T ti      tiems           ti        
SFX T ti      tus             ti        
SFX T ti      tais            ti        
SFX T ti      tuose           ti        
SFX T ti      ta              ti        
SFX T ti      tos             ti        
SFX T ti      tai             ti        
SFX T ti      toje            ti        
SFX T ti      toj             ti        
SFX T ti      toms            ti        
SFX T ti      tomis           ti        
SFX T ti      tose            ti        
SFX T tis     tasi            tis       
SFX T ti      tasis           ti        
SFX T ti      tojo            ti        
SFX T ti      tajam           ti        
SFX T ti      tąjį            ti        
SFX T ti      tuoju           ti        
SFX T ti      tajame          ti        
SFX T ti      tieji           ti        
SFX T ti      tųjų            ti        
SFX T ti      tiesiems        ti        
SFX T ti      tuosius         ti        
SFX T ti      taisiais        ti        
SFX T ti      tuosiuose       ti        
SFX T ti      toji            ti        
SFX T ti      tosios          ti        
SFX T ti      tajai           ti        
SFX T ti      tąją            ti        
SFX T ti      tąja            ti        
SFX T ti      tojoje          ti        
SFX T ti      tojoj           ti        
SFX T ti      tosioms         ti        
SFX T ti      tąsias          ti        
SFX T ti      tosiomis        ti        
SFX T ti      tosiose         ti        
SFX T ti      simas           [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simo            [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simam           [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simą            [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simu            [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simame          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simi            [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simų            [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simiems         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simus           [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simais          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simuose         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      sima            [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simos           [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simai           [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simoje          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simoj           [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simoms          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simomis         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simose          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T žti     šimas           žti       
SFX T žti     šimo            žti       
SFX T žti     šimam           žti       
SFX T žti     šimą            žti       
SFX T žti     šimu            žti       
SFX T žti     šimame          žti       
SFX T žti     šimi            žti       
SFX T žti     šimų            žti       
SFX T žti     šimiems         žti       
SFX T žti     šimus           žti       
SFX T žti     šimais          žti       
SFX T žti     šimuose         žti       
SFX T žti     šima            žti       
SFX T žti     šimos           žti       
SFX T žti     šimai           žti       
SFX T žti     šimoje          žti       
SFX T žti     šimoj           žti       
SFX T žti     šimoms          žti       
SFX T žti     šimomis         žti       
SFX T žti     šimose          žti       
SFX T šti     šimas           šti       
SFX T šti     šimo            šti       
SFX T šti     šimam           šti       
SFX T šti     šimą            šti       
SFX T šti     šimu            šti       
SFX T šti     šimame          šti       
SFX T šti     šimi            šti       
SFX T šti     šimų            šti       
SFX T šti     šimiems         šti       
SFX T šti     šimus           šti       
SFX T šti     šimais          šti       
SFX T šti     šimuose         šti       
SFX T šti     šima            šti       
SFX T šti     šimos           šti       
SFX T šti     šimai           šti       
SFX T šti     šimoje          šti       
SFX T šti     šimoj           šti       
SFX T šti     šimoms          šti       
SFX T šti     šimomis         šti       
SFX T šti     šimose          šti       
SFX T zti     simas           zti       
SFX T zti     simo            zti       
SFX T zti     simam           zti       
SFX T zti     simą            zti       
SFX T zti     simu            zti       
SFX T zti     simame          zti       
SFX T zti     simi            zti       
SFX T zti     simų            zti       
SFX T zti     simiems         zti       
SFX T zti     simus           zti       
SFX T zti     simais          zti       
SFX T zti     simuose         zti       
SFX T zti     sima            zti       
SFX T zti     simos           zti       
SFX T zti     simai           zti       
SFX T zti     simoje          zti       
SFX T zti     simoj           zti       
SFX T zti     simoms          zti       
SFX T zti     simomis         zti       
SFX T zti     simose          zti       
SFX T sti     simas           sti       
SFX T sti     simo            sti       
SFX T sti     simam           sti       
SFX T sti     simą            sti       
SFX T sti     simu            sti       
SFX T sti     simame          sti       
SFX T sti     simi            sti       
SFX T sti     simų            sti       
SFX T sti     simiems         sti       
SFX T sti     simus           sti       
SFX T sti     simais          sti       
SFX T sti     simuose         sti       
SFX T sti     sima            sti       
SFX T sti     simos           sti       
SFX T sti     simai           sti       
SFX T sti     simoje          sti       
SFX T sti     simoj           sti       
SFX T sti     simoms          sti       
SFX T sti     simomis         sti       
SFX T sti     simose          sti       
SFX T ti      simasis         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simojo          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simajam         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simąjį          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simuoju         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simajame        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simieji         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simųjų          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simiesiems      [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simuosius       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simaisiais      [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simuosiuose     [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simoji          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simosios        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simajai         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simąją          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simąja          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simojoje        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simojoj         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simosioms       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simąsias        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simosiomis      [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      simosiose       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T žti     šimasis         žti       
SFX T žti     šimojo          žti       
SFX T žti     šimajam         žti       
SFX T žti     šimąjį          žti       
SFX T žti     šimuoju         žti       
SFX T žti     šimajame        žti       
SFX T žti     šimieji         žti       
SFX T žti     šimųjų          žti       
SFX T žti     šimiesiems      žti       
SFX T žti     šimuosius       žti       
SFX T žti     šimaisiais      žti       
SFX T žti     šimuosiuose     žti       
SFX T žti     šimoji          žti       
SFX T žti     šimosios        žti       
SFX T žti     šimajai         žti       
SFX T žti     šimąją          žti       
SFX T žti     šimąja          žti       
SFX T žti     šimojoje        žti       
SFX T žti     šimojoj         žti       
SFX T žti     šimosioms       žti       
SFX T žti     šimąsias        žti       
SFX T žti     šimosiomis      žti       
SFX T žti     šimosiose       žti       
