RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.dic
aimanuoti/NTXdefijklouvx
akompanuoti/NTX
alpti/NTXade
angliuotis/T
apdraikalioti/STX
apibļæ½gti/NTX
apipinti/NTX
apmalļæ½inti/STX
apsigirdyti/STX
apsiliuobti/STX
apskritinti/NTXk
ardyti/NSTXabdefijkpquw
aļæ½trinti/NSTXcdeflprx
atidulkti/NTX
atkovoti/STX
atsigaivelļæ½ti/NTX
atsikvapstyti/NTX
atsiļæ½inti/NTX
aukļæ½tļæ½ti/NTX
badļæ½ti/NTXdeh
baksnoti/NTXf
banalinti/NTXk
baubtelļæ½ti/NTX
bendravardiklinti/NTXk
bintuoti/NTX
blaivyti/STXabdefikmopru
blimuotis/Tk
blusinļæ½tis/T
brangti/NTXf
brigzti/NTXbdefk
brungzti/NTXabdefgk
bļæ½gļæ½tauti/NTX
burzloti/NTX
ļæ½ļæ½ploti/NTXak
ļæ½iauļæ½kļæ½tis/T
ļæ½irkļæ½noti/NTX
ļæ½iulpļæ½ioti/NTX
ļæ½iurļæ½kļæ½ti/NTX
cukrļæ½ti/NTX
dairinļæ½tis/T
darinļæ½tis/T
dļæ½btelļæ½ti/NTX
dekoduoti/STXfv
derļæ½tis/T
dezorganizuoti/STX
dilgļæ½ti/NTX
dirstelļæ½ti/NTX
dylinļæ½ti/NTX
draikytis/T
drļæ½gti/NTXk
drimbinti/NTXd
drumsti/NSTXfkw
dļæ½ktelļæ½ti/NTX
dļæ½muoti/NTXf
dusti/NTXacdefjkln
dvilktelļæ½ti/NTX
dļæ½iļæ½gauti/NSTXfinrv
eksploatuoti/NTX
ļæ½sti/NTXacdefhijklmnoptvw
fokusuoti/STXkpqrvw
gainioti/NTXdejk
galvotis/T
gargaliuoti/NTXfjk
gaujoti/STX
gelstelļæ½ti/NTX
gervinti/NTX
ginļæ½ytis/T
giļæ½ļæ½ti/NTX
glamļæ½uotis/T
gliaumļæ½ti/NTXaj
gluosniuotis/T
goglinļæ½ti/NTX
grasinti/NTXbcefjl
gremļæ½ti/STXeq
grieļæ½ti/NTXcdefk
gryninti/NTXad
grumti/NSTXdkorw
gukļæ½ioti/NTX
gurļæ½ti/NTXdek
gvaldyti/NTXd
ļæ½brļæ½ļæ½ti/STX
ieļæ½kotis/T
ļæ½kvempti/STX
individualizuoti/NTX
internacionalizuoti/NSTX
irstinļæ½tis/T
iļæ½darinļæ½ti/STX
ļæ½sibaikļæ½tinti/STX
ļæ½siknisti/NTX
ļæ½siteisļæ½ti/NTX
iļæ½knisti/NTX
iļæ½mokslinti/STX
iļæ½radinļæ½ti/NTX
iļæ½sidairyti/NTX
iļæ½sikeroti/STX
iļæ½simurzinti/STX
iļæ½siteirauti/NTX
ļæ½sļæ½rļæ½ti/STX
iļæ½inti/NTX
jodinļæ½ti/NTXdikl
juoduoti/NTXefkl
kaļæ½iuoti/STX
kaitroti/NTX
kamanoti/NTXe
kapanotis/NTX
karnauti/NTX
kasioti/NTXadjkl
kaupinļæ½ti/NTX
keiksnoti/NSTXaflmnrv
kepersuoti/NTX
kerļæ½ytis/T
kiaukļæ½ioti/NTX
kilnoti/STXbdefhjklnqvwx
kioļæ½inti/NTX
kiļæ½telļæ½ti/NTX
kypuoti/NTX
klastelļæ½ti/NTX
kleivoti/NTX
klibļæ½ti/NTXf
kliuginti/NTX
klystis/T
knabenti/NTX
knerkļæ½ioti/NTX
kniļæ½bļæ½ioti/NTX
koketuoti/NTX
koneveikti/NTXdf
kooperuoti/NTX
kraikyti/NTXadfl
krasļæ½ioti/NTX
kreivuliuotis/T
krienyti/NTX
krivuliuoti/NTX
krļæ½pļæ½ioti/NTX
kļæ½kauti/NTX
kupetuotis/T
kvaituliuoti/NTX
kvykļæ½ti/NTX
lamstuoti/NTX
ledļæ½ti/NTXak
liepti/NTXbfn
liumpintis/T
lupikauti/NTX
malļæ½nininkauti/NTX
maudyti/NSTXadefpqrv
mļæ½lyniuoti/NTX
miglinti/NTX
mykļæ½ioti/NTX
mukti/NTXcdek
narintis/T
neutralizuoti/NTX
nokintis/T
nļæ½ksļæ½ti/NTX
nusidrļæ½ksti/STX
nusmeigti/STX
pabloļæ½kļæ½ti/NTX
pakabti/NTX
pamirkyti/STX
parsiankioti/STX
pasidrļæ½tinti/STX
pasinaļæ½inti/NTX
pasivaidenti/NTX
patinti/ENTX
peltakiuoti/NTX
pļæ½stinti/NTX
pirkdinti/NTXl
plaukyti/NTXdf
pliauļæ½kenti/NTX
plyļæ½inļæ½ti/NTXk
popieļæ½iauti/NTX
prasikalbļæ½ti/NTX
prieļæ½akļæ½ti/NTX
pripraļæ½yti/NTX
prisimeilinti/NTX
prisiļæ½monļæ½ti/NTX
programuoti/NSTXfhjklnrvwx
puolinļæ½ti/NTX
pustyti/NSTXbcdefjklpr
rakintis/T
raukytis/T
rļæ½kļæ½tis/T
rļæ½ļæ½ti/NSTXabcdehijklmnopqtuwx
ritenti/NTX
rumbuoti/NTX
ļæ½aipytis/T
santykiuoti/NTX
segdinti/NTX
ļæ½erpļæ½ti/NTX
silpti/NTXaejk
ļæ½iupļæ½ti/NTX
skaistļæ½ti/NTXf
skelsti/NTX
sklastyti/NTX
skustis/T
ļæ½lemļæ½ti/NTXjk
ļæ½liurpsļæ½ti/NTX
smalkinti/NTXj
ļæ½mirkļæ½ļæ½ioti/NTX
ļæ½nerkļæ½tis/T
ļæ½oktelļæ½ti/NTX
spirgti/NTXk
sprukti/NTXcdfi
stangļæ½ti/NTX
stypļæ½ioti/NTX
stļæ½guriuoti/NTX
sudroļæ½inļæ½ti/STX
sukliļæ½ti/NTX
sumieļæ½ti/STX
suraizgyti/STX
susigniauļæ½ti/STX
susimurzinti/STX
susivarvinti/STX
sutikinļæ½ti/STX
ļæ½vakļæ½telļæ½ti/NTX
sviestuotis/T
taikstyti/NSTXw
tarkļæ½telļæ½ti/NTX
tekļæ½ti/NTXabcdefijkl
terļæ½tis/T
tinti/NTXakl
tolyginti/NTX
trekļæ½ļæ½ti/NTX
trioļæ½kinti/NTX
tujinti/NTX
tvakļæ½ioti/NTX
tvokstis/T
urdļæ½ti/NTX
uļæ½kļæ½sti/STX
uļæ½sibrauti/NTX
uļæ½siļæ½irdinti/STX
vadinti/NSTXbcdfhjklnopqrtvwx
valcuotis/T
varijuotis/T
vļæ½brinti/NTX
vļæ½ptis/T
viauktelļæ½ti/NTX
vingrļæ½ti/NTX
visuomeninti/NTXk
voļæ½inļæ½ti/NTX
ļæ½argyti/NTX
ļæ½iauksļæ½ti/NTX
ļæ½irglinti/NTX
ļæ½legļæ½ti/NTXk
zuiti/NTX
zvimbtelļæ½ti/NTX
